West Virginia, session 2026, HB4853.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 3. Hospitals and Similar Institutions. §16B-3-22. Trauma Informed Care. Hospitals shall develop protocol to provide trauma informed care to patients who have experienced; a miscarriage, abuse, neglect, or other stressful events, which will include:(1) Providing training and continuing education on how best to provide trauma informed care. In developing training hospitals may consult with licensed mental health professionals, medical associations, and patient advocacy groups.(2) Compile resources to provide to patients;(A) Contact information for local or statewide mental health services;(B) Guidance on grief and emotional recovery;(C) Crisis support hotlines; and(D) Information on peer or community support groups. §16B-3-23. The Butterfly Protocol. (a) A hospital shall develop and implement a Butterfly Protocol for patients who have experienced a miscarriage.(b) The Butterfly Protocol shall, include;(1) Placing a discreet visual symbol, such as a small butterfly, on the patient’s chart or electronic medical record to alert staff; and(2) Training for the staff on the meaning of the symbol, to check for the symbol in the patient’s record or chart, and how to provide trauma informed care to patients with this symbol in their record.